Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 12.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8909
Veterinary drug distributor, defined.

Veterinary drug distributor means any person or entity that engages in the distribution of veterinary legend drugs in the State of Nebraska other than a pharmacy or a veterinarian licensed under the Uniform Credentialing Act acting within the scope of practice of veterinary medicine and surgery as defined in section 38-3312.

Laws 2008, LB1022, § 9;

Laws 2009, LB463, § 12.

Uniform Credentialing Act, see section 38-101.